Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.520

Advisory committee.

The department shall establish an advisory committee composed of interested parents and representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, early childhood education and development staff preparation programs, the head start programs, school districts, and such other community and business organizations as deemed necessary by the department to assist with the establishment of the preschool program and advise the department on matters regarding the ongoing promotion and operation of the program.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 211; 2006 c 263 s 413; 1988 c 174 s 5; 1985 c 418 s 5. Formerly RCW 43.215.420, 28A.215.140, 28A.34A.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Findings—1994 c 166; 1988 c 174: See note following RCW 43.216.505.